Tennessee, session 114, SB1826.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-44-108(a)(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(2) "Governing body" means the governing body of a board, agency, or
commission of state government and includes emergency communications district
boards of directors assisted by the emergency communications board, created by § 7-
86-302; and
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1826
011578
- 1 -